Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB107.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A hospital that offers emergency medical services shall have at least one (1) physician
who is:
(1) Licensed in Kentucky;
(2) Board certified or board eligible in emergency medicine;
(3) On site and on duty; and
(4) Responsible for the emergency department at all times the emergency department
is open.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 11/6/2025 9:33 AM Jacketed